Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-521
Audiology or speech-language pathology assistant; initial training.

Initial training for an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant shall consist of graduation from an accredited program with a focus on communication disorders which shall include:

(1) An overview of speech, language, and dysphagia and the practice of audiology and speech-language pathology;

(2) Ethical and legal responsibilities;

(3) Normal language, speech, and hearing functions and swallowing physiology;

(4) Observing and recording patient progress;

(5) Behavior management and modification; and

(6) Record keeping.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 26;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 72;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.04;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 206.